Georgia statutes. TITLE 22 Eminent Domain
PART 1 General Provisions

Law reviews.

For article, “Liabilities of the Former Officer or Director,” see 18 Ga. St. B.J. 150 (1982).

For article, “Condemning Local Government Condemnation,” see 39 Mercer L. Rev. 11 (1987).

22-2-1.
“Condemnor” defined.

As used in this article, the term “condemnor” means any person or corporation which has been authorized by the General Assembly to exercise the power of eminent domain.